Hawaii statutes.
[§432G-19] Coordination of benefits.
(a) Dental insurers are required to adopt provisions for coordination of
benefits to avoid overinsurance and to provide for the orderly payment of
claims when a person is covered by two or more group health insurance or health
care plans.

(b) Provisions adopted pursuant to subsection
(a) for the coordination of benefits shall be consistent with the coordination
of benefits provisions that are in general use in the State for coordinating
coverage between two or more group health insurance or health care plans. [L
2013, c 191, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next